src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
!! # Eastern Mari pronoun inflection

!! ## Lexica directed from root.lexc

LEXICON pronouns_not_from_xml !!= * @CODE@
мый+Pron+Pers: MYJ ;	
тый+Pron+Pers: TYJ ;	
тудо+Pron: TUDO ;	
тиде+Pron: TIDE ;	
шке+Pron+Refl: SHKE ;
кажне+Pron+Indef: KAZHNE ;
кеч-мо+Pron:кеч-мо PRON-INDEF ;
кеч-кӧ+Pron:кеч-кӧ PRON-INDEF ;
нимо+Pron:нимо PRON-INDEF ;
нигӧ+Pron:нигӧ PRON-INDEF ;
ала-мо+Pron:ала-мо PRON-INDEF ;
ала-кӧ+Pron:ала-кӧ PRON-INDEF ;
кеч-мо+Pron:кеч-мо PRON-INDEF ;
кеч-кӧ+Pron:кеч-кӧ PRON-INDEF ;
керек-мо+Pron:керек-мо PRON-INDEF ;
керек-кӧ+Pron:керек-кӧ PRON-INDEF ;
иктаж-мо+Pron:иктаж-мо PRON-INDEF ;
иктаж-кӧ+Pron:иктаж-кӧ PRON-INDEF ;

мо+Pron+Interr+Sg+PxSg2:моч N_KIN_SPECIAL ;
нимо+Pron+Neg+Sg+PxSg2:нимоч N_KIN_SPECIAL ;
кеч-мо+Pron+Indef+PxSg2:кеч-моч N_KIN_SPECIAL ;
керек-мо+Pron+Indef+PxSg2:керек-моч N_KIN_SPECIAL ;
ала-мо+Pron+Indef+PxSg2:ала-моч N_KIN_SPECIAL ;
иктаж-мо+Pron+Indef+PxSg2:иктаж-моч N_KIN_SPECIAL ;

LEXICON MYJ !!= * @CODE@
+Sg1+Nom:мый K_at ;
+Sg1+Nom+Use/NG:мые # ;
+Sg1+Gen:мыйын K_at ;
+Sg1+Der/Poss:мыйын N-ava_01_obl ;
+Sg1+Acc:мыйым K_at ;
+Sg1+Dat+Use/NG:мыланем K_at;
+Sg1+Dat:мылам K_at;
+Sg1+Com:мыйге # ;
+Sg1+Cmpr:мыйла # ;
+Pl1+Nom:ме K_at ;
+Pl1+Gen:мемнан K_at ;
+Pl1+Der/Poss:мемнан N-ava_01_obl ;
+Pl1+Acc:мемнам K_at ;
+Pl1+Dat:мыланна K_at ;
+Pl1+Dat+Use/NG:мемналан #;
+Pl1+Com:меге # ;
+Pl1+Cmpr:мела # ;

LEXICON TYJ !!= * @CODE@
+Sg2+Nom:тый K_at ;
+Sg2+Nom+Use/NG:тые # ;
+Sg2+Gen:тыйын K_at ;
+Sg2+Der/Poss:тыйын N-ava_01_obl ;
+Sg2+Acc:тыйым K_at ;
+Sg2+Dat+Use/NG:тыланет K_at;
+Sg2+Dat:тылат K_at;
+Sg2+Com:тыйге # ;
+Sg2+Cmpr:тыйла # ;
+Pl2+Nom:те K_at ;
+Pl2+Gen:тендан K_at ;
+Pl2+Der/Poss:тендан N-ava_01_obl ;
+Pl2+Acc:тендам K_at ;
+Pl2+Dat:тыланда K_at;
+Pl2+Dat+Use/NG:тендалан #;
+Pl2+Com:теге # ;
+Pl2+Cmpr:тела # ;

LEXICON TUDO !!= * @CODE@
+Pers+Sg3+Nom:туд%{оы%} K_at ;
+Pers+Sg3+Gen:тудын K_at ;
+Sg+Der/Poss:тудын N-ava_01_obl ;
+Pers+Sg3+Acc:тудым K_at ;
+Pers+Sg3+Dat:тудлан K_at;
+Pers+Sg3+Com:тудыге # ;
+Pers+Sg3+Cmpr:тудла # ;
+Pers+Sg3+Gen+PxSg3+So/PC:тудыжын K_at ;
+Pers+Sg3+Acc+PxSg3+So/PC:тудыжым K_at ;
+Pers+Sg3+Dat+PxSg3+So/PC:тудыжлан K_at;
+Pers+Pl3+Nom:нун%{оы%} K_at ;
+Pers+Pl3+Nom+PxSg3:нуныж K_at ;
+Pers+Pl3+Gen+PxSg3+So/PC:нуныжын K_at ;
+Pers+Pl3+Acc+PxSg3+So/PC:нуныжым K_at ;
+Pers+Pl3+Dat+PxSg3+So/PC:нуныжлан K_at ;
+Pers+Pl3+Nom+PxPl3:нунышт K_at ;
+Pers+Pl3+Gen+PxPl3+So/PC:нуныштын K_at ;
+Pers+Pl3+Acc+PxPl3+So/PC:нуныштым K_at ;
+Pers+Pl3+Dat+PxPl3+So/PC:нуныштлан K_at ;
+Pers+Pl3+Gen:нунын K_at ;
+Pl+Der/Poss:нунын N-ava_01_obl ;
+Pers+Pl3+Acc:нуным K_at ;
+Pers+Pl3+Dat:нунылан K_at;
+Pers+Pl3+Com:нуныге # ;
+Pers+Pl3+Cmpr:нуныла # ;

LEXICON TIDE !!= * @CODE@ 
+Dem+Sg+Nom:тид%{еы%} K_at ;
+Dem+Sg+Gen:тидын K_at ;
+Sg+Der/Poss:тидын N-ava_01_obl ;
+Dem+Sg+Acc:тидым K_at ;
+Dem+Sg+Dat:тидлан K_at;
+Dem+Sg+Com:тидыге # ;
+Dem+Sg+Cmpr:тидыла # ;
+Dem+Pl+Nom:нин%{еы%} K_at ;
+Dem+Pl+Cmpr:ниныла # ;
+Dem+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:тидыж%{еы%} K_at ;
+Dem+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Use/NG:тидыж ENDLEX ;
+Dem+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+So/PC:тидыжын K_at ;
+Dem+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+So/PC:тидыжым K_at ;
+Dem+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+So/PC:тидыжлан K_at;


LEXICON SHKE !!= * @CODE@ 
+Nom:шке K_at ;
+Nom+PxSg3:шкеж%{еы%} K_at ;
+Nom+PxSg3+Use/NG:шкеж ENDLEX ;
+Nom+PxPl3:шкешт K_at ;

+Gen+PxSg1:шкемын K_at ;
+PxSg1+Der/Poss:шкемын N-ava_01_obl ;
+Acc+PxSg1:шкемым K_at ;
+Dat+PxSg1:шканем K_at;
+Dat+PxSg1+Use/NG:шкаланем K_at;
+Gen+PxSg2:шкендын K_at ;
+PxSg2+Der/Poss:шкендын N-ava_01_obl ;
+Acc+PxSg2:шкендым K_at ;
+Dat+PxSg2:шканет K_at;
+Dat+PxSg2+Use/NG:шкаланет K_at;
+Gen+PxSg3:шкенжын K_at ;
+PxSg3+Der/Poss:шкенжын N-ava_01_obl ;
+Acc+PxSg3:шкенжым K_at ;
+Dat+PxSg3:шканж%{еы%} K_at;
+Dat+PxSg3+Use/NG:шкаланж%{еы%} K_at;
+Gen+PxPl1:шкенан K_at ;
+PxPl1+Der/Poss:шкенан N-ava_01_obl ;
+Acc+PxPl1:шкенам K_at ;
+Dat+PxPl1:шкaнна K_at;
+Dat+PxPl1+Use/NG:шкаланна K_at;
+Gen+PxPl2:шкендан K_at ;
+PxPl2+Der/Poss:шкендан N-ava_01_obl ;
+Acc+PxPl2:шкендам K_at ;
+Dat+PxPl2:шкaнда K_at;
+Dat+PxPl2+Use/NG:шкаланда K_at;
+Gen+PxPl3:шкеныштын K_at ;
+PxPl3+Der/Poss:шкеныштын N-ava_01_obl ;
+Acc+PxPl3:шкеныштым K_at ;
+Dat+PxPl3:шкaнышт K_at;
+Dat+PxPl3+Use/NG:шкаланышт K_at;


!! ## Pronoun lexica from xml

LEXICON Pimp  !!= * @CODE@
!+Pron: K ;
 K ;

LEXICON Pmuu !!= * @CODE@
+Interj: K ; ! Several Pmuu do not belong here

LEXICON PRON-IR_ !!= * @CODE@
+Interr: K ;
+Rel: K ;
!+Pron+Interr: K ;
!+Pron+Rel: K ;

LEXICON PRON_ !!= * @CODE@
: K ;
!+Pron: K ;

LEXICON PronRes !!= * @CODE@
+Pron+Recipr+Acc:%>м K_at ;
+Pron+Recipr+Dat:%>лан K_at ;
+Pron+Recipr+Gen:%>н K_at ;
+Pron+Recipr+Der/Poss:%>н N-ava_01_obl ;
+Pron+Recipr+Nom: K_at ;
+Pron+Recipr+Nom+PxSg3:%>ж ENDLEX ;
+Pron+Recipr+Acc+PxPl1:%>нам K_at ;
+Pron+Recipr+Dat+PxPl1:%>налан K_at ;
+Pron+Recipr+Dat+PxPl1+Use/NG:%>ланна K_at ;
+Pron+Recipr+Gen+PxPl1:%>нан K_at ;
+Pron+Recipr+PxPl1+Der/Poss:%>нан N-ava_01_obl ;
+Pron+Recipr+Nom+PxPl1:%>на K_at ;
+Pron+Recipr+Acc+PxPl2:%>дам K_at ;
+Pron+Recipr+Dat+PxPl2:%>далан K_at ;
+Pron+Recipr+Dat+PxPl2+Use/NG:%>ланда K_at ;
+Pron+Recipr+Gen+PxPl2:%>дан K_at ;
+Pron+Recipr+PxPl2+Der/Poss:%>дан N-ava_01_obl ;
+Pron+Recipr+Nom+PxPl2:%>да K_at ;
+Pron+Recipr+Acc+PxPl3:%>Ы1штым K_at ;
+Pron+Recipr+Dat+PxPl3:%>Ы1штлан K_at ;
+Pron+Recipr+Dat+PxPl3+Use/NG:%>ланышт K_at ;
+Pron+Recipr+Gen+PxPl3:%>Ы1штын K_at ;
+Pron+Recipr+PxPl3+Der/Poss:%>Ы1штын N-ava_01_obl ;
+Pron+Recipr+Nom+PxPl3:%>Ы1шт K_at ;


LEXICON PronI !!= * @CODE@
: # ;
!+Pron: # ;

LEXICON PronIR !!= * @CODE@
+Interr: # ;
!+Pron+Interr: # ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR/REL_
+Interr: N-ava_01 ;
+Rel: N-ava_01 ;
!+Pron+Interr: N-ava_01 ;
!+Pron+Rel: N-ava_01 ;


LEXICON PronInd !!= * @CODE@
+Pron+Ind: K_at  ;

LEXICON PRON-INDEF !!= * @CODE@
+Indef+Acc:%>Ы1м K_at ;
+Indef+Dat:%>лан K_at ;
+Indef+Gen:%>Ы1н K_at ;
+Indef+Nom+PxSg3+So/PC:%>ж ENDLEX ;
+Indef+Nom+PxSg3+So/PC:%>ыжЫ2 K_at ;
+Indef+Acc+PxSg3+So/PC:%>ыж%>ым K_at ;
+Indef+Acc+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жы%>м K_at ;
+Indef+Dat+PxSg3+So/PC:%>ыж%>лан K_at ;
+Indef+Dat+PxSg3+So/PC:%>ж%>лан K_at ;
+Indef+Gen+PxSg3+So/PC:%>ыж%>ын K_at ;
+Indef+Gen+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жы%>н K_at ;
+Indef+Nom: K_at ;

LEXICON KAZHNE !!= * @CODE@
+Nom:кажн%{еы%} K_at ;
+Gen:кажнын K_at ;
+Der/Poss:кажнын N-ava_01_obl ;
+Acc:кажным K_at ;
+Dat:кажнылан K_at ;
+Ine:кажнышт{еы%} K_at ;
+Ill:кажнышт{еы%} K_at ;
+Nom+PxSg3:кажныж%{еы%} K_at ;
+Nom+PxSg3+Use/NG:кажныж ENDLEX ;
+Gen+PxSg3+So/PC:кажныжын K_at ;
+Gen+PxSg3+Der/Poss:кажныжын N-ava_01_obl ;
+Acc+PxSg3+So/PC:кажныжым K_at ;
+Dat+PxSg3+So/PC:кажныжлан K_at ;
+Ine+PxSg3+So/CP:кажныштыж%{еы%} K_at ;
+Ill+PxSg3+So/CP:кажнышкыж%{еы%} K_at ;
+Nom+PxPl1:кажнына K_at ;
+Gen+PxPl1+So/PC:кажнынан K_at ;
+Gen+PxPl1+Der/Poss:кажнынан N-ava_01_obl ;
+Acc+PxPl1+So/PC:кажнынам K_at ;
+Dat+PxPl1+So/CP:кажныланна K_at ;
+Nom+PxPl2:кажныда K_at ;
+Gen+PxPl2+So/PC:кажныдан K_at ;
+Gen+PxPl2+Der/Poss:кажныдан N-ava_01_obl ;
+Acc+PxPl2+So/PC:кажныдам K_at ;
+Dat+PxPl2+So/CP:кажныланда K_at ;
+Nom+PxPl3:кажнышт K_at ;
+Gen+PxPl3+So/PC:кажныштын K_at ;
+Gen+PxPl3+Der/Poss:кажныштын N-ava_01_obl ;
+Acc+PxPl3+So/PC:кажныштым K_at ;
+Dat+PxPl3+So/PC:кажныштлан K_at ;

LEXICON PronDem !!= * @CODE@
+Pron+Dem: # ;

LEXICON PronRef !!= * @CODE@
+Pron+Refl: # ;
